District of Columbia statutes.
44-208

Quality assurance.

(a)

The Mayor shall operate a laboratory reference system and shall prescribe standards for the examination of specimens.

(b)

The Mayor shall adopt rules pursuant to § 44-213 that:

(1)

Prohibit payment to laboratory personnel based upon the number of tests performed; and

(2)

Limit the number of hours that laboratory personnel may work.

(c)

The Mayor shall set standards for proficiency testing programs to determine a satisfactory result, a satisfactory level of overall performance, and a substandard level of overall performance.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-182, § 9, 35 DCR 7718

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1508.